Utah statutes.
35A-8-1402.   Assistance to low-income persons -- Contracts -- Administration.

(1) (a)  The department may assist certain low-income families and individuals in the payment of home energy costs.

(b)  Assistance given under this part shall be made available to households throughout the state, irrespective of the source of household energy supply.

(2)  The department may contract with one or more public or private agencies to distribute and administer these funds subject to the criteria established by the department.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

